Tennessee, session 114, SB1876.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 10-7-504(r), is amended by deleting
the second sentence and substituting:
The bank account information that must be kept confidential includes, but is not
limited to, debit card numbers and any related personal identification numbers
(PINs) or authorization codes, bank account numbers, transit routing numbers,
names and location of financial institutions, and specific account information such
as names, taxpayer identification numbers (TINs), and addresses associated
with the bank account.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1876
010030
- 1 -